ru: Программное обеспечение > Программное обеспечение для компьютеров > Программное обеспечение для дизайна и обработки мультимедиа: Программное обеспечение для 3D-моделирования; Программное обеспечение для работы с анимацией; Программное обеспечение для графического дизайна и иллюстрирования; Программное обеспечение для дизайна интерьеров; Программное обеспечение для редакционно-издательских работ; Программное обеспечение для просмотра мультимедиа; Программное обеспечение для создания музыки; Программное обеспечение для обработки звука; Программное обеспечение для обработки видео; Программное обеспечение для веб-дизайна
cs: Software > Počítačový software > Multimediální software: CAD software; Software pro úpravu animací; Software pro grafický design a kreslení; Software pro navrhování domů a interiérů; Publikační software pro domácnost; Software pro přehrávání médií; Software pro skládání hudby; Software na úpravu zvuku; Software pro střih videa; Software pro navrhování webových stránek
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์คอมพิวเตอร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์การออกแบบและมัลติมีเดีย: ซอฟต์แวร์การสร้างโมเดล 3 มิติ; ซอฟต์แวร์ตัดต่อภาพเคลื่อนไหว; ซอฟต์แวร์อาร์ตเวิร์กและกราฟิกดีไซน์; ซอฟต์แวร์การออกแบบบ้านและตกแต่งภายใน; ซอฟต์แวร์การพิมพ์สำหรับใช้ที่บ้าน; ซอฟต์แวร์การดูสื่อ; ซอฟต์แวร์การประพันธ์เพลง; ซอฟต์แวร์ตัดต่อเสียง; ซอฟต์แวร์ตัดต่อวิดีโอ; ซอฟต์แวร์ออกแบบเว็บ
fi: Ohjelmisto > Tietokoneohjelmisto > Multimedia- ja suunnitteluohjelmisto: 3D-mallinnusohjemisto; Animaatioeditointiohjelmistot; Graafisen suunnittelun ja piirtämisen ohjelmistot; Sisustussuunnitteluohjelmistot; Kotikäyttöiset taitto-ohjelmistot; Mediakatseluohjelmistot; Sävellysohjelmistot; Äänenmuokkausohjelmistot; Videonmuokkausohjelmistot; Verkkosuunnitteluohjelmistot
en: Software > Computer Software > Multimedia & Design Software: 3D Modeling Software; Animation Editing Software; Graphic Design & Illustration Software; Home & Interior Design Software; Home Publishing Software; Media Viewing Software; Music Composition Software; Sound Editing Software; Video Editing Software; Web Design Software
nb: Programvare > Dataprogramvare > Multimedia- og designprogramvare: Programvare for 3D-modellering; Programvare for animasjonsredigering; Programvare for grafisk design og illustrasjon; Programvare for hjem- og interiørdesign; Programvare for hjemmepublisering; Programvare for medievisning; Programvare for musikkomposisjon; Programvare for lydredigering; Programvare for videoredigering; Programvare for webdesign
hr-HR: Softver > Računalni softver > Softver za multimediju i dizajn: Softver za 3D modeliranje; Softver za uređivanje animacija; Softver za grafički dizajn i ilustracije; Softver za uređenje doma i interijera; Softver za kućno izdavaštvo; Softver za gledanje medija; Softver za skladanje glazbe; Softver za uređivanje zvuka; Softver za uređivanje videozapisa; Softver za web-dizajn
vi: Phần mềm > Phần mềm máy tính > Phần mềm đa phương tiện & phần mềm thiết kế: Phần mềm tạo mẫu 3D; Phần mềm chỉnh sửa hiệu ứng; Phần mềm minh họa và thiết kế đồ họa; Phần mềm thiết kế nhà và nội thất; Phần mềm xuất bản tại gia; Phần mềm xem/phát tệp đa phương tiện; Phần mềm soạn nhạc; Phần mềm chỉnh sửa âm thanh; Phần mềm chỉnh sửa video; Phần mềm thiết kế web
el: Λογισμικό > Λογισμικό υπολογιστών > Λογισμικό πολυμέσων & σχεδίασης: Λογισμικό τρισδιάστατης μοντελοποίησης; Λογισμικό επεξεργασίας κινουμένων σχεδίων; Λογισμικό γραφιστικής & εικονογράφησης; Λογισμικό σχεδίασης σπιτιού & εσωτερικών χώρων; Λογισμικό οικιακής δημοσίευσης; Λογισμικό προβολής πολυμέσων; Λογισμικό σύνθεσης μουσικής; Λογισμικό επεξεργασίας ήχου; Λογισμικό επεξεργασίας βίντεο; Λογισμικό σχεδίασης ιστοσελίδων
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Kompiuterių programinė įranga > Multimedijos ir dizaino programinė įranga: 3D modeliavimo programinė įranga; Animacijos redagavimo programinė įranga; Grafinio dizaino ir iliustracijų programinė įranga; Namų ir interjero dizaino programinė įranga; Namų leidybos programinė įranga; Medijų peržiūros programinė įranga; Muzikos komponavimo programinė įranga; Garso redagavimo programinė įranga; Vaizdo įrašų redagavimo programinė įranga; Žiniatinklio dizaino programinė įranga
pt-BR: Software > Software de computador > Software de multimídia e design: Software de modelagem 3D; Software para edição de animação; Software de design gráfico; Software de design de interiores; Software de publicação doméstico; Software de visualização multimídia; Software para composição de música; Software de edição de som; Software para edição de vídeos; Software de webdesign
ro-RO: Software > Software de calculator > Software multimedia și de proiectare: Software pentru modelare 3D; Software de editare a animațiilor; Software de design grafic și ilustrație; Software pentru amenajări interioare; Software pentru editare și publicare; Software de vizualizare media; Software de compoziție muzicală; Software de editare de sunet; Software de editare video; Software de proiectare pagini web
sk-SK: Softvér > Počítačový softvér > Softvér pre multimédiá a dizajn: Softvér na 3D modelovanie; Softvér na úpravu animácií; Softvér na grafický dizajn a ilustrácie; Softvér na navrhovanie domov a interiérov; Softvér na domáce publikovanie; Softvér na prezeranie médií; Softvér na skladanie hudby; Softvér na úpravu zvuku; Softvér na úpravu videa; Softvér na tvorbu webových stránok
fr: Logiciels > Logiciels informatiques > Graphisme et multimédia: Logiciels de modélisation 3D; Éditeurs d'animations; Logiciels de traitement d'image; Logiciels de décoration d'intérieur; Logiciels de publication; Logiciels de lecture multimédia; Création musicale; Montage audio; Logiciels de montage vidéo; Logiciels de création de sites Web
tr: Yazılım > Bilgisayar Yazılımları > Multimedya ve Tasarım Yazılımları: 3B Modelleme Yazılımları; Animasyon Hazırlama Yazılımları; Grafik Tasarım ve İllüstrasyon Yazılımları; Ev ve İç Tasarım Yazılımları; Ev Yayıncılığı Yazılımları; Medya Görüntüleme Yazılımları; Müzik Besteleme Yazılımları; Ses Montaj Yazılımları; Görüntü Montaj Yazılımları; Web Tasarımı Yazılımları
zh-CN: 软件 > 电脑软件 > 多媒体和设计软件: 3D建模软件; 动画编辑软件; 图形设计/插图软件; 家居/室内设计软件; 家用排版软件; 媒体浏览软件; 音乐创作软件; 音频编辑软件; 视频编辑软件; 网络设计软件
da: Software > Computersoftware > Multimedie- og designsoftware: Software til 3D-modellering; Software til animering; Software til grafisk design og illustration; Software til indretning af hjemmet; Software til publicering for private; Software til visning af medier; Software til musikproduktion; Software til lydredigering; Software til videoredigering; Software til webdesign
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Računalniška programska oprema > Programska oprema za večpredstavnost in oblikovanje: Programska oprema za 3D modeliranje; Programska oprema za urejanje animacij; Programska oprema za grafično oblikovanje in ilustracije; Programska oprema za dom in notranjo opremo; Programska oprema za domače založništvo; Programska oprema za ogled medijev; Programska oprema za skladanje glasbe; Programska oprema za urejanje zvoka; Programska oprema za urejanje videoposnetkov; Programska oprema za spletno oblikovanje
ko: 소프트웨어 > 컴퓨터 소프트웨어 > 멀티미디어/디자인 소프트웨어: 3D 모델링 소프트웨어; 애니메이션 편집 소프트웨어; 그래픽 디자인/일러스트레이션 소프트웨어; 집/인테리어 디자인 소프트웨어; 홈 퍼블리싱 소프트웨어; 미디어 재생 소프트웨어; 작곡 소프트웨어; 사운드 편집 소프트웨어; 동영상 편집 소프트웨어; 웹 디자인 소프트웨어
es: Software > Software informático > Software de diseño y multimedia: Software de modelado 3D; Software de edición de animación; Software de diseño gráfico; Software de diseño de hogar e interiores; Software de edición no profesional; Software multimedia; Software de composición musical; Software de edición de sonido; Software de edición de vídeo; Software de diseño web
nl: Software > Computersoftware > Software voor multimedia en design: 3D-modeleersoftware; Software voor animatiebewerking; Software voor grafisch ontwerp; Software voor woninginrichting en interieurdesign; Software voor desktoppublishing; Software voor mediaweergave; Software voor componeren van muziek; Software voor geluidsbewerking; Videobewerkingssoftware; Software voor webdesign
pt-PT: Software > Software de computador > Software de design e multimédia: Software de modelação 3D; Software de edição de animação; Software de ilustração e design gráfico; Software de design de interiores e de habitação; Software de uso pessoal; Software de visualização de conteúdo multimédia; Software de composição musical; Software de edição de som; Software de edição de vídeo; Software de design web
it: Software > Software per computer > Software contenuti multimediali e progettazione: Software di modellazione 3D; Software di animazione; Software progettazione grafica; Software per home e interior design; Software home publishing; Software visualizzazione multimediale; Software composizione musicale; Software per montaggio audio; Software montaggio video; Software per grafica web
ja: ソフトウェア > PCソフト > マルチメディアソフト: 3Dモデリングソフト; アニメーション編集ソフト; グラフィックデザインソフト; ホーム・インテリアデザインソフト; ホームパブリッシングソフト; メディアプレイヤー; 作曲ソフト; 音声編集ソフト; 動画編集ソフト; ウェブデザインソフト
bg-BG: Софтуер > Компютърен софтуер > Софтуер за мултимедия и дизайн: Софтуер за 3D моделиране; Софтуер за редактиране на анимация; Софтуер за графичен дизайн и илюстрация; Софтуер за домашен и интериорен дизайн; Софтуер за редакционнa и издателска работа; Софтуер за медии; Софтуер за композиране на музика; Софтуер за редактиране на звук; Софтуер за редактиране на видео; Софтуер за уеб дизайн
sv: Programvara > Datorprogramvara > Program för multimedia och design: Program för 3D-modellering; Program för animationsredigering; Program för grafisk design och illustrationer; Program för hem- och interiördesign; Program för hemmapublicering; Program för mediavisning; Program för musikframställning; Program för ljudredigering; Program för videoredigering; Program för webbdesign
pl: Oprogramowanie > Programy komputerowe > Programy do multimediów i projektowania: Programy do modelowania 3D; Programy do edycji animacji; Programy graficzne i ilustracyjne; Programy do projektowania wnętrz; Domowe programy DTP; Programy do odtwarzania multimediów; Programy do komponowania muzyki; Programy do obróbki dźwięku; Programy do obróbki wideo; Programy do tworzenia stron www
hu: Szoftver > Számítógépes szoftver > Multimédia és tervező szoftver: 3D modellező szoftver; Animációszerkesztő szoftver; Grafikai tervező és illusztrációs szoftver; Lakás- és belsőépítészeti szoftver; Otthoni kiadói szoftver; Médiamegjelenítő szoftver; Zeneszerző szoftver; Hangszerkesztő szoftver; Videószerkesztő szoftver; Webtervező szoftver
zh-TW: 軟體 > 電腦軟體 > 多媒體與設計軟體: 3D 建模軟體; 動畫編輯軟體; 圖像設計軟體; 房屋/室內設計軟體; 家用桌面出版軟體; 媒體播放器軟體; 音樂製作軟體; 聲音編輯軟體; 視訊編輯軟體; 網頁設計軟體
de: Software > Computersoftware > Software für Multimedia & Design: Software zur Erstellung von 3D-Modellen; Animationsbearbeitungssoftware; Graphic-Design-Software; Software zur Innenraumgestaltung; Home-Publishing-Software; Software zur Medienwiedergabe; Software für Musikkomposition; Tonbearbeitungssoftware; Videobearbeitungssoftware; Web-Design-Software